Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,116.02
Shareholders information; failure to file; disapproved; effect; penalty.

Any domestic stock insurer or any person who uses any proxy, consent or authorization obtained in violation of sections 44-3,115 to 44-3,118, or who fails to make the filing required by sections 44-3,115 to 44-3,118 and who thereafter uses any document required to be filed, or who uses any document before it has been filed with the director for the required period of time, or who uses any such document after receiving written notice that the document has been disapproved by the Director of Insurance, or who uses any document which is false or misleading with respect to any material fact or omits to state any material fact shall forfeit to the State of Nebraska the sum of one thousand dollars. Such forfeiture, which shall be in lieu of any criminal penalties for such act or failure to act which might be deemed to arise under the provisions of sections 44-3,115 to 44-3,118, shall be payable to the State Treasurer and shall be recoverable in a civil suit in the name of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1969, c. 369, § 4, p. 1311.